Alaska statutes. Title 41. Public Resources.
Article 3. Alaska Marine Parks.

Legislative history reports. —

For Adoption of House intent statements relating to ch. 64, SLA 1983, see 1983 House Journal, pp. 2061 and 2063.

Sec. 41.21.300.
Declaration of purpose.

The purpose of AS

41.21.300

—

41.21.306

is to establish, subject to valid existing rights, the state-owned or acquired land and water described in AS

41.21.304

as marine park units of the Alaska state park system. The primary purposes in establishing the land and water areas described in AS

41.21.304

as marine park units of the Alaska state park system are to

maintain natural, cultural, and scenic values;

maintain fish and wildlife resources and lawful existing uses of these resources;

promote and support recreation and tourism in the state.

The land and water described in AS

41.21.304

is dedicated as special purpose sites under art. VIII, § 7 of the state constitution.

History.

(§ 1 ch 64 SLA 1983)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 41.20.530. Renumbered in 1983.

Cross references. —

For legislative findings and statement of purpose for management of marine parks, see § 1, ch. 52, SLA 2008, in the 2008 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For Alaska marine parks, see 11 AAC 20, art. 14.

Sec. 41.21.302.
Management of marine parks.

The state land and water described in AS

41.21.304

is assigned to the department for control, maintenance, and development consistent with the purposes and provisions of AS

41.21.300

—

41.21.306

.

The Department of Fish and Game is responsible for the management of fish and game resources on the state land and water described in AS

41.21.304

consistent with the purposes of AS

41.21.300

—

41.21.306

. The Department of Fish and Game shall give written notice to and consult with the department before adoption of regulations governing fish and game management in a marine park unit of the Alaska state park system.

The department shall develop a management plan for each marine park unit of the Alaska state park system to determine the specific purposes and uses for the unit. The commissioner shall give written notice and consult with the Department of Fish and Game, proximately located municipalities of the state, proximately located private landowners, the United States Forest Service, organizations concerned with conservation, recreation, and tourism, and other interested parties during the preparation of a management plan for a marine park unit of the Alaska state park system. A management plan required under this subsection shall be completed by June 14, 1995, for each marine park unit established before June 14, 1990, and within five years of the establishment of the unit for units established after June 13, 1990.

The commissioner may not prohibit fishing, hunting, or trapping within a marine park unit of the Alaska state park system. The commissioner may not restrict the exercise of fishing, hunting, or trapping rights permitted under law or under a regulation of the Board of Fisheries or the Board of Game within a marine park unit of the Alaska state park system.

The commissioner shall allow the development of aquaculture facilities within a marine park unit of the Alaska state park system under terms and conditions that ensure that the development is compatible with AS

41.21.300

—

41.21.306

.

The commissioner may enter into a cooperative agreement for

the management of a marine park unit of the Alaska state park system with a federal agency, a municipality of the state, or a proximately located private landowner for a purpose stated under AS

41.21.020(a)(7)

; or

the management of proximately located federal, municipal, or private land as part of a marine park unit of the Alaska state park system.

In the management of a marine park unit of the Alaska state park system the commissioner shall consult and cooperate with a Native corporation that owns an historical or cultural site granted under 43 U.S.C. 1613(h)(1) (sec. 14(h)(1) of the Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act) and that is proximately located to a marine park unit of the Alaska state park system. In the management of a marine park unit of the Alaska state park system the commissioner shall address the potential conflicts with the cultural and historical values of land granted to a Native corporation under 43 U.S.C. 1613(h)(1) (sec. 14(h)(1) of the Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act) and shall provide for appropriate protection to these values.

Nothing in AS

41.21.300

—

41.21.306

precludes the use of or access to land proximately located to a marine park unit of the Alaska state park system or to mineral claims and leases. The commissioner shall permit adequate and feasible access across state land within a marine park unit of the Alaska state park system to and from private and public land within or outside a unit. In the granting of such access the commissioner may adopt reasonable regulations to protect the natural and other values of the marine park unit land and water.

The commissioner may enter into a concession contract under AS

41.21.027

and AS 36 to provide services or construct facilities in a marine park unit of the Alaska state park system.

History.

(§ 1 ch 64 SLA 1983; am § 1 ch 67 SLA 1986; am §§ 1, 2 ch 14 SLA 1990; am § 13 ch 168 SLA 1990; am § 2 ch 52 SLA 2008)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 41.20.532. Renumbered in 1983.

Administrative Code. —

For Alaska marine parks, see 11 AAC 20, art. 14.

Sec. 41.21.304.
Designated land and water.

The state-owned land and water and that land and water acquired by the state in the future lying within the following described parcels are designated as marine park units of the Alaska state park system:

Bettles Bay

Oliver Inlet

Sawmill Bay

Shoup Bay

South Esther Island

Surprise Cove

Chilkat Islands

Ziegler Cove

Horseshoe Bay

Sullivan Island

Shelter Island: the following described parcels excluding submerged land seaward of the 10 fathom bathymetric line:

Saint James Bay

Taku Harbor

Funter Bay

Section 1: Lot 1

Sections 1 and 12: The following described tracts, excluding U.S. Surveys Nos. 2448 and 3149:

Beginning at Corner No. 4, Lone Star Lode claim, U.S. Mineral Survey No. (M.S.) 1492 proceed N. 70 degrees 00 feet E. along the north boundary of said claim a distance of 359.15 feet more or less to Corner No. 3, Otter Lode claim, M.S. 1492; thence N. 5 degrees 50 feet E. a distance of 666.60 feet more or less along the west boundary of the Otter Lode claim to Corner No. 4 of said claim; thence N. 70 degrees 00 feet E. a distance of 1,500.00 feet more or less along the north boundary of the Otter Lode claim, M.S. 1492 to Corner No. 1 of said claim, said Corner being common to Corner No. 2, Mill Site claim, M.S. 2191; thence N. 5 degrees 27 feet W. to an intersect with the southwest boundary of ISH NIC claim, M.S. 2191; thence N. 44 degrees 00 feet W. along said boundary to Corner No. 4 of ISH NIC claim; thence N. 46 degrees 00 feet E. along the northwest boundary of ISH NIC claim a distance of 321.62 feet more or less to Corner No. 3 of Beach No. 4 claim, M.S. 2191, common with Corner No. 2 of Beach No. 1 claim, M.S. 2191; thence N. 44 degrees 00 feet W. along the southwest boundary of Beach No. 4 claim a distance of 600.00 feet more or less to Corner No. 4 of Beach No. 4 claim; thence N. 46 degrees 00 feet E. along the northwest boundary of Beach No. 4 claim a distance of 1,099.47 feet more or less to Corner No. 1 of Beach No. 4 claim, common with Corner No. 1 of Beach No. 5 claim, M.S. 2191; thence N. 44 degrees 00 feet W. along the southwest boundaries of Beach No’s. 6 and 7 claims, M.S. 2191 a distance of 1,200.00 feet more or less to Corner No. 1 of Beach No. 7 claim; thence N. 46 degrees 00 feet E. along the northwest boundary of Beach No. 7 claim a distance of 135.10 feet more or less to Corner No. 4 U.S. Survey No. (U.S.S.) 3149; thence continue N. 46 degrees 00 feet E. along the northwest boundaries of Beach No’s. 7 and 8 claims, M.S. 2191 a distance of 2,864.90 feet more or less to Corner No. 2, Beach No. 8 claim; thence due west a distance of 3,300 feet more or less to an intersection of a line projected due north from Meander Corner (M.C.) No. 3, U.S.S. 2448; thence due south a distance of 1,214 feet more or less to M.C. No. 3, U.S.S. 2448; thence meander along the mean high water line of the northeast shore of Funter Bay in a southwesterly, easterly, southeasterly, southwesterly direction a distance of 1.11 miles more or less to a point lying S. 70 degrees 00 feet W. from Corner No. 4, Lone Star Lode claim, M.S. 1492 on the mean high water line of the easterly shore of Funter Bay; thence N. 70 degrees 00 feet E. to Corner No. 4, Lone Star Lode claim; the point of beginning.

That portion of Mill Site, Mineral Survey (M.S.) No. 2191, described as follows: beginning at Corner No. 1, Mill Site, on line 2-3, Beach No. 1, M.S. 2191, thence S. 5 degrees 27 feet E., 57.26 feet, to the intersection of line 1-4, ISH NIC, M.S. 2191; thence S. 46 degrees 00 feet W., 264.36 feet, along a portion of line 1-4, of ISH NIC, to Corner No. 4, ISH NIC, M.S. 2191; thence S. 44 degrees 00 feet E., 331.75 feet, along a portion of line 4-3 of ISH NIC, to the intersection of line 1-2, Mill Site; thence S. 5 degrees 27 feet E., 137.55 feet, along a portion of line 1-2 of Mill Site, to Corner No. 2, Mill Site, identical to Corner No. 1 of Otter, M.S. 1492; thence S. 70 degrees 00 feet W., 1,500.00 feet, on line 2-3, Mill Site, identical to line 1-4 of Otter, M.S. 1492, to Corner No. 3, Mill Site, M.S. 2191, identical to Corner No. 4 of Otter, M.S. 1492; thence N. 5 degrees 27 feet W., 497.70 feet, on line 3-4, along the mean-high tide line of Funter Bay, to Corner No. 4, Mill Site; thence N. 30 degrees 07 feet E., 183.08 feet, on line 4-5, along the mean-high tide line of Funter Bay, to Corner No. 5, Mill Site, identical to Corner No. 3, Beach No. 1, M.S. 2191; thence N. 70 degrees 00 feet E., 1,390.00 feet, on line 5-1, Mill Site, identical to a portion of line 3-2, Beach No. 1, to Corner No. 1, the point of beginning.

That portion of Beach No. 1, Mineral Survey (M.S.) No. 2191, described as follows: beginning at Corner No. 2, Beach No. 1, identical with Corner No. 3, Beach No. 4, M.S. 2191, on line 4-1 of ISH NIC, M.S. 2191, thence S. 70 degrees 00 feet W., 1,500.00 feet on line 2-3, Beach No. 1, identical to a portion of line 1-5, Mill Site, M.S. 2191, to Corner No. 3, Beach No. 1, identical to Corner No. 5, Mill Site; thence N. 12 degrees 43 feet E., 460.00 feet, along the mean-high tide line of Funter Bay to Corner No. 4, Beach No. 1; thence N. 47 degrees 23 feet E., 157.50 feet, along the mean-high tide line of Funter Bay, to Corner No. 5, Beach No. 1; thence N. 14 degrees 02 feet E., 183.33 feet, along the mean-high tide line of Funter Bay, to Corner No. 6, Beach No. 1, identical to Corner No. 4, Beach No. 2, M.S. 2191; thence N. 70 degrees 00 feet E., 874.74 feet, on line 6-1, Beach No. 1, identical to a portion of line 4-3 of Beach No. 2, to the intersection of line 4-1, Beach No. 4, M.S. 2191; thence S. 46 degrees 00 feet W., 126.34 feet, along a portion of line 4-1 of Beach No. 4, to Corner No. 4, Beach No. 4; thence S. 44 degrees 00 feet E., 600.00 feet, on line 4-3, Beach No. 4, to Corner No. 3, Beach No. 4, identical to Corner No. 2, Beach No. 1, the point of beginning.

That portion of Beach No. 2, Mineral Survey (M.S.) No. 2191, described as follows: beginning at the true point for Corner No. 1, Beach No. 2, thence N. 70 degrees 00 feet E., 1,197.45 feet, along a portion of line 1-2 of Beach No. 2, to the intersection of line 1-4 of Beach No. 6, M.S. 2191; thence S. 44 degrees 00 feet E., 223.40 feet, along a portion of line 1-4 of Beach No. 6, to Corner No. 4, Beach No. 6, identical with Corner No. 1, Beach No. 5, M.S. 2191; thence S. 46 degrees 00 feet W., 973.13 feet, along a portion of line 1-4 of Beach No. 4, to the intersection of line 3-4 of Beach No. 2; thence S. 70 degrees 00 feet W., 874.74 feet, along a portion of line 3-4 of Beach No. 2, to Corner No. 4, Beach No. 2, identical with Corner No. 6, Beach No. 1; thence N. 14 degrees 03 feet E., 478.00 feet, along the mean-high tide line of Funter Bay, to Corner No. 5, Beach No. 2; thence N. 25 degrees 33 feet E., 291.00 feet, along the mean-high tide line of Funter Bay, to Corner No. 1, Beach No. 2, the point of beginning.

That portion of Beach No. 3, Mineral Survey (M.S.) No. 2191, described as follows: beginning at Corner No. 1, Beach No. 3, thence N. 70 degrees 00 feet E., 637.07 feet, along a portion of line 1-2, to the intersection of line 1-4, Beach No. 7, M.S. 2191; thence S. 44 degrees 00 feet E., 279.27 feet, along a portion of line 1-4 of Beach No. 7, to Corner No. 4, Beach No. 7, identical to Corner No. 1, Beach No. 6, M.S. 2191, thence continue S. 44 degrees 00 feet E., 376.60 feet, along a portion of line 1-4 of Beach No. 6, to the intersection of line 3-4, Beach No. 3; thence S. 70 degrees 00 feet W., 1,139.45 feet, along a portion of line 3-4 of Beach No. 3, to Corner No. 4, Beach No. 3; thence N. 1 degree 30 feet E., 644.00 feet, along the mean-high tide line of Funter Bay, on line 4-1, to Corner No. 1, Beach No. 3, to point of beginning. Containing 12.22 acres.

Joe Mace Island

Thoms Place

Beecher Pass

Dall Bay

Security Bay

Boswell Bay Beaches

Canoe Passage

Decision Point

Driftwood Bay

Entry Cove

Granite Bay

Kayak Island

Jack Bay

Safety Cove

Sandspit Point

Sunny Cove

Thumb Cove

Magoun Islands

Big Bear/Baby Bear Bays

Juneau Area Islands: Aaron, Battleship, Benjamin, Bird, Coghlan, Cohen, Gull, Indian, Lincoln, Little, North, Portland, Ralston, and Suedla Islands: the following described parcels excluding submerged land seaward of the 10 fathom bathymetric line:

Township 10 North, Range 6 East, Seward Meridian

Section 12: S1/2 SW1/4, SW1/4 SE1/4

Section 13: NW1/4, W1/2 NE1/4, N1/2 SW1/4, NW1/4 SE1/4

Section 14: N1/2 SE1/4, S1/2 NE1/4, NE1/4 NE1/4;

Township 43 South, Range 68 East, Copper River Meridian

Section 28: SW1/4

Section 32: E1/2 E1/2

Section 33: NW1/4, W1/2 SW1/4;

Township 9 South, Range 9 West, Copper River Meridian

Section 22: E1/2 SE1/4, SW1/4 SE1/4

Section 23: SW1/4, S1/2 NW1/4, NE1/4 NW1/4, W1/2 NE1/4

Section 26: W1/2

Section 27: E1/2, S1/2 SW1/4

Section 28: E1/2 SE1/4

Section 33: NE1/4 NE1/4

Section 34: N1/2, SE1/4, N1/2 SW1/4, SE1/4 SW1/4

Section 35: W1/2

Township 10 South, Range 9 West, Copper River Meridian

Section 3: N1/2 NE1/4;

Township 8 South, Range 7 West, Copper River Meridian

Section 30: W1/2 W1/2

Section 31: W1/2 W1/2

Township 8 South, Range 8 West, Copper River Meridian

Section 25: All

Section 26: All

Section 27: E1/2

Section 34: E1/2

Section 35: All

Section 36: All

Township 9 South, Range 8 West, Copper River Meridian

Section 1: N1/2 NW1/4

Section 2: N1/2

Section 3: All;

Township 8 North, Range 8 East, Seward Meridian

Section 3: W1/2, W1/2 SE1/4, SW1/4 NE1/4

Section 4: E1/2 E1/2, SW1/4 SE1/4

Section 5: E1/2 SW1/4, SW1/4 SW1/4, SE1/4 NW1/4

Section 6: E1/2 SW1/4, S1/2 SE1/4, NW1/4 SE1/4

Section 7: N1/2 NE1/4, SE1/4 NE1/4

Section 8: E1/2, NW1/4, N1/2 SW1/4, SE1/4 SW1/4

Section 9: All

Section 10: N1/2 NW1/4, SW1/4 NW1/4

Section 16: N1/2

Section 17: NE1/4, E1/2 NW1/4

Township 9 North, Range 8 East, Seward Meridian

Section 33: S1/2 NW1/4, SW1/4 NE1/4, E1/2 SW1/4, W1/2 SE1/4;

Township 8 North, Range 6 East, Seward Meridian

Section 21: SE1/4, E1/2 SW1/4

Section 22: SE1/4, S1/2 SW1/4, SE1/4 NE1/4

Section 23: W1/2 SW1/4, SW1/4 NW1/4

Section 26: W1/2 W1/2

Section 27: All

Section 28: S1/2, NE1/4, E1/2 NW1/4

Section 29: SE1/4 SE1/4

Section 34: N1/2 N1/2

Section 35: NW1/4 NW1/4;

Township 32 South, Range 60 East, Copper River Meridian

Section 22: SE1/4

Section 23: All

Section 26: All

Section 27: All

Section 34: All

Section 35: All

Township 33 South, Range 61 East, Copper River Meridian

Section 4: All

Section 5: All

Section 8: All

Section 9: All

Section 16: All;

Township 9 North, Range 6 East, Seward Meridian

Section 25: SW1/4, W1/2 SE1/4

Section 26: E1/2

Section 36: N1/2 N1/2;

Township 1 South, Range 9 East, Seward Meridian

Section 32: SE1/4

Township 2 South, Range 9 East, Seward Meridian

Section 4: S1/2 SW1/4 excluding amended Iron Mountain Lode No. 2 and Iron Mountain Lode

Section 5: All

Section 8: N1/2 excluding Iron Mountain Lode No. 11 and Iron Mountain Lode No. 10

Section 9: NW1/4 NW1/4 excluding amended Iron Mountain Lode No. 2 and Iron Mountain Lode;

Township 34 South, Range 60 East, Copper River Meridian

Section 12: SE1/4

Township 34 South, Range 61 East, Copper River Meridian

Section 7: All

Section 18: All

Section 19: All

Section 30: All;

Township 39 South, Range 64 East, Copper River Meridian

Section 29: All

Section 31: All

Section 32: All

Section 33: All

Township 40 South, Range 64 East, Copper River Meridian

Section 5: NW1/4NE1/4, S1/2NE1/4, NW1/4, S1/2

Section 6

Section 8

Section 9: W1/2;

Township 37, South, Range 62 East, Copper River Meridian

Section 27: All

Section 28: All

Section 29: All

Section 30: SE1/4, SE1/4 SW1/4

Section 31: E1/2 NW1/4, NE1/4 SW1/4, E1/2

Section 32: All

Section 33: All

Section 34: All

Section 35: W1/2

Township 38 South, Range 62 East, Copper River Meridian

Section 2: W1/2

Section 3: All

Section 4: All

Section 5: All

Section 6: NE1/4, E1/2 SE1/4

Section 8: N1/2, NE1/4 SW1/4, SE1/4

Section 9: All

Section 10: All

Section 11: W1/2

Section 14: NW1/4

Section 15: N1/2

Section 16: N1/2

Section 17: N1/2 NE1/4, SE1/4 NE1/4;

U.S. Mineral Survey No. 2192

Township 44 South, Range 70 East, Copper River Meridian

Section 5:
W1/2 SW1/4, W1/2 E1/2 SW1/4

Section 6:
E1/2 SE1/4

Section 7:
NE1/4, NE1/4 SE1/4, S1/2 SE1/4

Section 8:
W1/2, excluding ILMT 33289 (ATS682) and excluding a parcel of land described as:
Beginning at the record corner for Cor. No. 2, U.S. Survey No. 370; thence east along line 2-3 of U.S. Survey No. 370 a distance of 125´; thence north a distance of 350´; thence west approximately 90´ to the intersection of this line within the mean high tide line of the Taku Harbor; thence meander along the mean high tide line of Taku Harbor in a southwesterly and southern direction approximately 355´ to Cor. No. 2, U.S. Survey No. 370, the true point of beginning

Section 17:
W1/2 W1/2

Section 18:
E1/2, excluding tideland permit 100597;

Township 42 South, Range 64 East, Copper River Meridian

Section 2: Lots 1 — 5, including all adjacent tideland

Tract A: That portion within the W1/2 NW1/4 of Protracted

Section 1, and NE1/4 and N1/2 SE1/4 of Protracted Section 2; Tract 37;

aggregating approximately 251.3 acres, more or less, according to the Bureau of Land Management plat of survey, filed December 3, 1999;

Section 2:
W1/2

Section 3:
S1/2 SW1/4, NW1/4 SW1/4

Section 4:
S1/2 NE1/4, E1/2 SE1/4

Section 10:
N1/2 N1/2, S1/2 NE1/4

Section 11:
NW1/4, NW1/4 NE1/4, including all tide and submerged land;

Township 64 South, Range 75 East, Copper River Meridian Lot 4, U.S. Survey 3854 and adjacent tideland;

Township 65 South, Range 86 East, Copper River Meridian

Section 32:
S1/2

Township 66 South, Range 86 East, Copper River Meridian

Section 4:
SW1/4, S1/2 NW1/4, NW1/4 NW1/4, S1/2 SE1/4, NW1/4SE1/4

Section 5:
All except for land within ASLS 81-234

Section 8:
NE1/4

Section 9:
N1/2, SE1/4;

Township 61 South, Range 79 East, Copper River Meridian

Section 1:
NE1/4SW1/4, Lots 5 — 8

Section 10:
Lots 1 — 2, including all adjacent tideland

Section 11:
Lots 1 — 11, including all adjacent tideland

Section 12:
Lots 3 — 11, including all adjacent tideland

Section 14:
Lot 2, including all adjacent tideland

Section 15:
Lot 1, including all adjacent tideland

Township 61 South, Range 80 East, Copper River Meridian

Section 6:
Lot 11, including all adjacent tideland

Section 7: Lots 1 — 2, including all adjacent tideland;

Township 77 South, Range 91 East, Copper River Meridian

Section 29:
W1/2 SW1/4, SW1/4 NW1/4

Section 30:
SE1/4, E1/2 SW1/4

Section 31:
NE1/4, N1/2 SE1/4, NE1/4 SW1/4, E1/2 NW1/4 subject to USS 3525 and A.T.S. 155

Section 32:
NW1/4, N1/2 SW1/4;

Township 58 South, Range 70 East, Copper River Meridian

Section 1:
SW1/4 SW1/4

Section 2:
S1/2

Section 11:
N1/2, SE1/4, E1/2 SW1/4

Section 12:
W1/2 W1/2, E1/2 SW1/4 subject to Forest Service Preference 103521

Section 13:
All subject to Historic Place Application AA-6569, Parcel A

Section 14:
NE1/4;

Township 17 South, Range 5 West, Copper River Meridian

Section 10:
Above the mean high tide line

Section 15:
Above the mean high tide line, except South of Point Bentinck South of a line bearing South 68 degrees East, below the mean high tide line

Sections 19 — 22;

Township 15 South, Range 5 West, Copper River Meridian

Section 31:
E1/2E1/2

Section 32

Township 16 South, Range 4 West, Copper River Meridian

Section 6:
S1/2, S1/2N1/2

Township 16 South, Range 5 West, Copper River Meridian

Section 3:
The land South and West of the mid-channel of Canoe Passage

Section 4:
The land and water south of the mid-channel of Canoe Passage in N1/2

Section 5:
N1/2N1/2, SE1/4NE1/4

Section 10: N1/2NE1/4

Sections 11 — 12: N1/2N1/2;

Township 8 North, Range 6 East, Seward Meridian

Section 5: SW1/4SW1/4

Section 6:
S1/2S1/2

Section 7:
N1/2, N1/2S1/2

Section 8:
W1/2NW1/4, NW1/4SW1/4;

Township 3 South, Range 1 East, Seward Meridian

Section 14:
SW1/4

Section 15

Section 16:
E1/2E1/2

Section 21:
NE1/4NE1/4

Section 22:
N1/2

Section 23: NW1/4;

Township 8 North, Range 6 East, Seward Meridian

Section 2:
S1/2

Section 3:
SE1/4, S1/2SW1/4

Sections 10 — 11: N1/2;

Township 9 North, Range 8 East, Seward Meridian

Sections 4 — 6:
S1/2

Sections 7 — 8

Section 9:
N1/2, SW1/4

Section 17: W1/2W1/2

Section 18:
E1/2, E1/2NW1/4;

Township 22 South, Range 5 East, Copper River Meridian

Section 25

Section 36:
N1/2, SW1/4, W1/2SE1/4

Township 22 South, Range 6 East, Copper River Meridian

Section 16:
N1/2, SW1/4, N1/2SE1/4, SW1/4SE1/4

Section 20

Section 21:
NW1/4, NW1/4SW1/4

Section 29:
NW1/4

Section 30:
W1/2

Township 23 South, Range 5 East, Copper River Meridian

Section 1: N1/2NW1/4, SW1/4NW1/4

Section 2

Sections 10 — 11;

Township 9 South, Range 7 West, Copper River Meridian

Section 31:
S1/2SW1/4

Township 9 South, Range 8 West, Copper River Meridian

Section 35:
SE1/4SE1/4

Section 36:
S1/2S1/2

Township 10 South, Range 7 West, Copper River Meridian

Section 6:
N1/2NW1/4

Township 10 South, Range 8 West, Copper River Meridian

Section 1

Section 2:
N1/2, N1/2N1/2S1/2

Section 3: NE1/4NE1/4

Section 12:
E1/2NE1/4, E1/2W1/2NE1/4;

Township 2 South, Range 1 East, Seward Meridian

Section 23:
S1/2

Section 24:
SW1/4

Section 25:
NW1/4

Section 26: N1/2;

Township 3 South, Range 1 East, Seward Meridian

Section 5:
SW1/4, S1/2SE1/4

Section 8:
N1/2;

Township 3 South, Range 1 East, Seward Meridian

Section 19

Section 20:
W1/2W1/2

Township 3 South, Range 1 West, Seward Meridian

Section 24:
E1/2E1/2;

Township 2 South, Range 1 East, Seward Meridian

Section 16:
W1/2, W1/2NE1/4

Section 17:
E1/2;

Township 54 South, Range 62 East, Copper River Meridian

Section 20:
S1/2NE1/4, SE1/4

Section 21: Excluding Krestof Island

Section 22: W1/2SW1/4, excluding Krestof Island

Section 28:
N1/2, N1/2SW1/4, excluding Krestof Island

Section 29

Section 32:
N1/2, N1/2S1/2;

Township 51 South, Range 61 East, Copper River Meridian

Section 13:
S1/2N1/2, S1/2

Section 14: SE1/4SE1/4

Section 23: E1/2

Section 24:
W1/2E1/2, W1/2

Section 25:
NW1/4NE1/4, NW1/4, NW1/4SW1/4

Section 26:
N1/2, N1/2S1/2.

Township 38 South, Range 63 East, Copper River Meridian

Section 13

Section 24: E1/2NE1/4

Section 32:
E1/2

Section 33:
SW1/4

Township 38 South, Range 64 East, Copper River Meridian

Section 18:
SW1/4

Section 19

Section 20:
W1/2SW1/4

Section 29:
NW1/4NW1/4

Section 30:
N1/2

Township 39 South, Range 63 East, Copper River Meridian

Section 4

Section 9

Section 10

Section 11

Section 13:
E1/2

Section 14

Section 15

Section 16:
E1/2

Section 22:
N1/2

Section 23

Section 24

Township 39 South, Range 64 East, Copper River Meridian

Section 8:
SE1/4

Section 9:
SW1/4

Section 16

Section 17:
NE1/4

Section 18: S1/2

Section 19

Section 20: SW1/4

Section 30: except for USS 354

Section 34:
S1/2

Township 40 South, Range 64 East, Copper River Meridian

Section 1:
W1/2NW1/4

Section 3:
NE1/4

Section 4

Section 5

Section 9

Section 10

Section 15

Section 16

Section 17: NE1/4

Section 36: SE1/4SE1/4

Township 40 South, Range 65 East, Copper River Meridian

Section 28: SW1/4

Section 31:
SW1/4SW1/4

Section 32:
E1/2

Section 33:
W1/2

Section 34: W1/2E1/2, W1/2

Township 41 South, Range 65 East, Copper River Meridian

Section 1:
NE1/4

Section 2:
W1/2NW1/4, SW1/4

Section 3:
NE1/4

Section 11

Township 41 South, Range 66 East, Copper River Meridian

Section 5: NW1/2NW1/4, NW1/4NW1/4NE1/4

Section 6:
NW1/4.

History.

(§ 1 ch 64 SLA 1983; am § 2 ch 67 SLA 1986; am § 3 ch 14 SLA 1990; am §§ 3, 4 ch 52 SLA 2008; am § 1 ch 3 SLA 2021)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 41.20.534. Renumbered in 1983. In 1993, in the description in paragraph (5) of land within Section 33, “S1/2NW1/4” was substituted for “SW1/2NW1/4” to correct a manifest error in § 1, ch. 64, SLA 1983; and in the description in paragraph (17) of land within Section 15, “Lot 1” was substituted for “Lot 2” to correct a manifest error in § 2, ch. 67, SLA 1986.

Cross references. —

For legislative findings and statement of purpose applicable to the 2008 amendment of paragraph (11) and addition of paragraph (34) of this section, see § 1(a)(3) and § 1(b), ch. 52, SLA 2008, in the 2008 Temporary and Special Acts.

For a provision directing the Department of Natural Resources to amend the management plan for the Funter Bay marine park unit to reflect the addition of state land and water described in
AS

41.21.304

(14), as amended by sec. 1,
ch. 3, SLA 2021, and to protect the social and historical significance of the Unangax UNHANDLEDCHAR
cemetery located in the park, see sec. 2,
ch. 3, SLA 2021, in the 2021 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2021 amendment, effective June 9, 2021, added (14)(A), and made related changes.

Sec. 41.21.306.
Incompatible uses.

The commissioner may prohibit or restrict by regulation except as provided in AS

41.21.302(d)

incompatible uses within the state-owned land and water described in AS

41.21.304

.

[Repealed, § 2 ch 126 SLA 1984.]

Nothing in AS

41.21.300

—

41.21.306

prohibits the Department of Fish and Game from engaging in rehabilitation, enhancement, and development under AS

16.05.092

within an area described in AS

41.21.304

.

Reasonable access shall be permitted to and across a marine park unit of the Alaska state park system for lawful hunting, fishing, trapping and recreational purposes, and other lawful purposes.

The Department of Public Safety and the Department of Fish and Game shall be allowed reasonable access for fish and game management, research, and enforcement purposes.

History.

(§ 1 ch 64 SLA 1983; am § 2 ch 126 SLA 1984; am § 3 ch 67 SLA 1986)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 41.20.536. Renumbered in 1983.